Massachusetts, session 194th, S1246.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 39 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended in subsection (a) by inserting in line 4, after the words “national origin” the
following words:- , sex, gender.
of 1